Maryland, session 2026, SB0967.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Land Use
8–308.
(A) Any person aggrieved by a decision of a commission may appeal the decision
in the manner provided for an appeal from the decision of the planning commission of the
local jurisdiction.
(B) IN ADDITION TO THE RIGHT TO APPEAL PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION, A LOCAL JURISDICTION MAY AUTHORIZE ANY PERSON
AGGRIEVED BY A DECISION OF A COMMISSION TO APPEAL THE DECISION TO THE
BOARD OF APPEALS OF THE LOCAL JURISDICTION, THE APPROPRIATE CIRCUIT
COURT, OR BOTH.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0967*

SENATE BILL 967
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.